Missouri, session 2026, HB2252.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 170.057, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 170.057, to read as follows:
170.057. 1. The school board of any school district may expend either textbook fund
moneys or incidental fund moneys to provide supplementary texts, library reference books,
instructional supplies, and contractual educational television services for the pupils of the
district's elementary and secondary schools.
2. (1) This subsection shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Teachers Classroom Supply Assistance Program".
(2) As used in this subsection, "school supplies" has the same definition as in
section 144.049.
(3) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, the department
of elementary and secondary education shall provide moneys to each school district and
charter school for each of the school district's and charter school's teachers to purchase
classroom materials and school supplies for the students in the teachers' classrooms. No
such moneys shall be used to purchase equipment.
(4) The department shall calculate an amount of such moneys for each school
district and charter school based on the average daily attendance of resident pupils
enrolled in the school district or charter school in the previous year and distribute such
amount to each school district and charter school before August first of each year.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2252 2
(5) Upon receipt of the moneys calculated under subdivision (4) of this
subsection, each school district and charter school shall calculate an identical amount of
such moneys for each teacher estimated to be employed on September first of the school
year and make available such amount to each teacher before August fifteenth of each
year.
(6) The department shall establish a method for each school district and charter
school to provide each teacher with a debit card to use for purchasing classroom
materials and supplies with the amount calculated in subdivision (5) of this subsection.
Any debit card issued under this section shall clearly indicate on the front that the card
has been issued for the Missouri teachers classroom supply assistance program, shall
display the expiration date on the back of the card, and shall display the school district's
or charter school's tax exempt number on the front or the back of the card. The
department shall determine any necessary procedures and requirements for use of the
debit cards.
(7) Each teacher who accepts a debit card under this section shall sign a
statement developed by the department that acknowledges receipt and the terms of
proper use of the debit card.
(8) Each teacher who uses a debit card provided under this section shall submit
all receipts for all purchases made with such card to the school district or charter school.
The school district or charter school shall keep all such receipts for at least five years to
show that moneys expended meet the requirements of this section.
(9) Any unexpended amount available for teachers under this subsection shall
remain in the account established for the deposit of moneys under this section and shall
be available for distribution to teachers in subsequent years.
(10) The department may promulgate all necessary rules for the administration
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010,
that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if
it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
✔